src/fst/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON Nouns
akanaine noun_dem ;
akkašikko noun_koll ;
akšu noun ;
alahaisies noun_koll ;
alahisto noun_koll ;
appiehut noun_dem ;
appiela noun ;
arokko noun_koll ;
astavoittšija noun ;
aukkoine noun_dem ;
avosuonet noun_mon ;
ellohko noun_mod ;
eläntähys noun ;
etonaine noun_dem ;
eärin noun ;
haiputti noun_deskr ;
hakkoanta noun ;
hankoine noun_dem ;
hapinat noun_mon ;
harjakkaiset noun_mon ;
harjaniekka noun ;
harjieset noun_mon ;
hasero noun_deskr ;
hautaine noun_dem ;
hautajaiset noun_mon ;
hauvahko noun_mod ;
havineh noun ;
heimoveh noun_koll ;
heinoveh noun_koll ;
heinöveh noun_koll ;
helmitys noun ;
helväine noun_dem ;
herralisto noun_koll ;
herraveh noun_koll ;
herroveh noun_koll ;
hetelmöine noun ;
hetvelöine noun_dem ;
heähkö noun_mod ;
heäjöveh noun_koll ;
himoine noun_dem ;
hirvi noun ;
hohlit noun_mon ;
hojakattava noun_mod ;
honkahaine noun_dem ;
hoorat noun_mon ;
houkattšu noun ;
hussuine noun_dem ;
hutjahus noun ;
hut́kat noun_mon ;
hämyine noun_dem ;
hätkehkö noun_mod ;
hätkempäine noun_komp ;
hätkettšäine noun_mod ;
höikäleh noun_deskr ;
höipelö noun_deskr ;
hökšeh noun ;
höytelöine noun_dem ;
ikriššät noun_mon ;
isäine noun_dem ;
itaroitšus noun ;
jakajaiset noun_mon ;
joukkoveh noun ;
joutoine noun_dem ;
juustuine noun_dem ;
jälettšimet noun_mon ;
jälkiset noun_mon ;
järsky noun ;
kairaine noun_dem ;
kalajas noun_koll ;
kalipat noun_mon ;
kaltehet noun_mon ;
kalut noun_dem ;
kamukset noun_mon ;
kanarjalisto noun_koll ;
kanfuusa noun ;
kansoveh noun_koll ;
kapissekset noun_mon ;
karttamukset noun_mon ;
kasine noun_dem ;
kasse noun ;
kastiettšaine noun_mod ;
kasvatekset noun_mon ;
kataloašat noun_mon ;
katšalkat noun_mon ;
kellottimet noun_mon ;
kerittšemet noun_mon ;
kertaine noun_dem ;
kerähmöitšys noun ;
kesreäntähine noun_mon ;
keyhälistö noun_koll ;
kimalehut noun_dem ;
kimseli noun ;
kirikköveh noun_koll ;
kirnujaiset noun_mon ;
klämttšä noun ;
kniiška noun_dem ;
koalikset noun_mon ;
koatieset noun_dem.mon ;
koavaiset noun_mon ;
kohtalisto noun_koll ;
kohtoveh noun_koll ;
koiralisto noun_koll ;
kolmoveh noun_koll ;
kolota noun ;
koppuine noun_dem ;
kortikki noun ;
kosat noun_mon ;
kouhtaine noun_dem ;
kreäšnä noun ;
krintšat noun_mon ;
kuivavo noun ;
kukšinaine noun_dem ;
kunnahikko noun_koll ;
kuomakset noun_mon ;
kuplo noun ;
kuppine noun_dem ;
kuptšalisto noun_koll ;
kurpit noun_mon.vaill ;
kuršut noun_mon.vaill ;
kut́mulisto noun_koll ;
kuve noun ;
kykähäine noun_dem ;
kylähkö noun_mod ;
kyläjäs noun_koll ;
kylöveh noun_koll ;
kälykset noun_mon ;
käpryšköine noun_dem ;
kärsky noun ;
körkköi noun_deskr ;
laipoit noun_mon ;
laksies noun_koll ;
lampahut noun_dem ;
lapavus noun ;
lehikkö noun_koll ;
lehvomaiset noun_mon ;
lehväine noun_dem ;
leipoveh noun_koll ;
lentieset noun_mon ;
leyhäkys noun ;
lievemmys noun_komp ;
liijahko noun_mod ;
liijattava noun_mod ;
liikkoveh noun_koll ;
liittšaine noun_dem ;
linjoarit noun_mon ;
linnalisto noun_koll ;
linnoveh noun_koll ;
loajitelmus noun ;
lohkoveh noun_koll ;
lokaine noun_dem ;
lujat noun_mon ;
lujemmus noun_komp ;
lumppu noun ;
luokoveh noun_koll ;
lähimys noun_sup ;
lähtiehyt noun_dem ;
länket noun_mon ;
lökšy noun ;
manteristo noun_koll ;
marjaine noun_dem ;
marukset noun_mon ;
matkoveh noun_koll ;
mavuttomus noun ;
miehistö noun_koll ;
miskaine noun_dem ;
mosku noun ;
multieset noun_mon ;
munttiset noun_dem.mon ;
must́oihut noun_dem ;
muurahikko noun ;
muuttieset noun_mon ;
mäkeveh noun_koll ;
mäkilistö noun_koll ;
möykättšy noun_mod ;
nakasaanie noun ;
nakrehut noun_dem ;
narota noun_koll ;
ńaukkoi noun_vaill ;
neljöveh noun_koll ;
neveskäkset noun_mon ;
niistosva noun ;
niittoveh noun_koll ;
niituksut noun_dem ;
nipurittša noun_vaill ;
nirsat noun_mon ;
nošnittšemet noun_mon ;
nossilnitšat noun_mon ;
nousentšat noun_mon ;
nuorilisto noun_koll ;
nuoriso noun_koll ;
nuottaveh noun_koll ;
nuottoveh noun_koll ;
nurmittšaine noun_dem ;
ńuro noun ;
nälempäine noun_komp ;
nälähkö noun_mod ;
nälättävä noun_mod ;
näpläkkäine noun_mod ;
nätšky noun_vaill ;
oasat noun_mon ;
ohtoine noun_dem ;
olalline noun ;
omalisto noun_koll ;
orahaine noun_dem ;
ostoaiset noun_mon ;
ottamattomus noun ;
oturkka noun_vaill ;
otus noun_vaill ;
pahalisto noun_koll ;
pahnoveh noun_koll ;
paimoveh noun_koll ;
paisiehut noun_dem ;
pajarilisto noun_koll ;
palsami noun ;
panijaiset noun_mon ;
pantotška noun_dem ;
pappilisto noun_koll ;
patuka noun ;
pehuine noun_dem ;
peroveh noun_koll ;
persokset noun_mon ;
peskuine noun_dem ;
pesus noun_koll ;
petenöi noun ;
peäläiset noun_dem.mon ;
peälät noun_mon ;
pihoveh noun_koll ;
pihtimyöt noun_dem.mon ;
pihtoine noun_dem ;
pihtyöt noun_dem.mon ;
pijätys noun ;
piŕaine noun_dem ;
pliise(i) noun ;
plottaine noun_dem ;
poarakset noun_mon ;
pohatisto noun_koll ;
pohattalisto noun_koll ;
pohattola noun_koll ;
pohjasies noun_koll ;
poikoveh noun_koll ;
pokossisto noun_koll ;
pokosta noun ;
pokostoveh noun_koll ;
pokut noun_dem ;
portahuot noun_dem.mon ;
possakka noun ;
potsat noun_mon ;
povoataine noun_dem ;
pratanakset noun_mon ;
prihalisto noun_koll ;
prijoatelsva noun ;
priukat noun_mon ;
präškä noun ;
puhtiet noun_mon ;
puisut noun_dem ;
puppine noun_dem ;
purates noun ;
purlakisto noun_koll ;
purossekset noun_mon ;
puuhut noun_dem ;
pyytöveh noun_koll ;
päintä noun ;
pärehyt noun_dem ;
pöksyiset noun_dem.mon ;
raja(h)iset noun_mon ;
rammitšenta noun ;
rapaine noun_dem ;
repoveh noun_koll ;
retuine noun_dem ;
reähkitšys noun ;
ristieset noun_mon ;
roakku noun ;
roivahaine noun_dem ;
roti(i)teĺat noun_mon ;
rotńalisto noun_koll ;
rotoveh noun_koll ;
rousontšiekka noun ;
ruokkijaine noun_dem ;
ryöttšy noun ;
röpöiset noun_dem.mon ;
šaha noun_vaill ;
šaikkaine noun_dem ;
šaikkoveh noun_koll ;
salatti noun ;
šamkki noun_taipum ;
sarajas noun_koll ;
šaravoarat noun_mon ;
saverkkaine noun_dem ;
savus noun ;
šeikkoveh noun_koll ;
senttšaiset noun_dem.mon ;
sevoittarekset noun_mon ;
seäköiseätšinä noun_vaill ;
šielo noun_vaill ;
šiippa noun ;
šiitaine noun_dem ;
sisärintämäkset noun_mon ;
skamnine noun_dem ;
skotka noun ;
snimsat noun_mon ;
šnipukka noun_vaill ;
soappa noun ;
soaraine noun_dem ;
śoloveh noun_koll ;
sotrevoine noun_dem ;
sotvero noun ;
sreäppieset noun_mon ;
štaniset noun_dem.mon ;
štanit noun_mon ;
stormohka noun ;
stunai noun_vaill ;
suitšet noun_mon ;
sukaine noun_dem ;
sulikki noun_vaill ;
suurus noun ;
suutoine noun_dem ;
svajakakset noun_mon ;
svajoveh noun_koll ;
svoatpoveh noun_koll ;
svätkat noun_mon ;
säsi noun ;
takkaine noun_dem ;
taloveh noun_koll ;
t́ašat noun_mon ;
telkin noun ;
tenninvoi noun_vaill ;
tikkaine noun_dem ;
tohturi noun ;
toroveh noun_koll ;
trepentšät noun_mon ;
trupa noun ;
trupaine noun_dem ;
truukukset noun_mon ;
tšipi noun ;
tšipsuine noun_dem ;
tširpikkähät noun_mon ;
tšukunaine noun_dem ;
tšypläine noun ;
tulemisto noun_koll ;
tulieset noun_mon ;
tultavaine noun_dem ;
turvehunta noun ;
tuukkaine noun_dem ;
tyrššyiset noun_dem.mon ;
tyttöšikko noun_koll ;
töhyrit noun_mon ;
tönkkä noun ;
töppähyt noun_dem ;
usor noun ;
ussaiset noun_dem.mon ;
utaret noun_mon ;
uutšoihut noun_dem ;
valvonta(h)ine noun ;
varattšimet noun_mon ;
vasikkaine noun_dem ;
veikokset noun_mon ;
velattava noun_mod ;
venttšajaiset noun_mon ;
venttšavus noun ;
vetoine noun_dem ;
vika noun ;
viltiet noun_mon ;
virnaine noun_dem ;
virssattšu noun_mod ;
voaroveh noun_koll ;
voitamine noun ;
vonkaine noun_dem ;
vuokkiniemies noun_koll ;
vuotieset noun_mon ;
yhkeh noun ;
